Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1276.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 30, O.S.L. 2025
(70 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 1-126), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-126. A. As used in this section:
1. “Bell to bell” means the time between the first bell ringing
at the start of the school day to begin instructional time until the
dismissal bell at the end of the school day to end instructional
time; and
2. “Personal electronic device” means a personal device capable
of connecting to a smart phone, the Internet, or a cellular or Wi-Fi
network, or directly connecting to another similar device. Personal
electronic devices include, but are not limited to, smart watches,

smart headphones, laptops, tablets, and smart glasses. Personal
electronic devices shall not include school-issued or school-
approved devices that are specifically limited for use in classroom
instruction.
B. 1. For the 2025-2026 school year and each school year
thereafter, each school district board of education shall adopt a
policy prohibiting students from using cell phones and personal
electronic devices while on the campus of a public school district
from bell to bell. The policy shall include disciplinary procedures
for violations.
2. For the 2026-2027 school year and each school year
thereafter, each school district board of education may adopt a
policy prohibiting students from using cell phones and personal
electronic devices while on the campus of a public school district
from bell to bell.
C. The policy adopted pursuant to subsection B of this section
may provide for exceptions including, but not limited to:
1. Emergency use of cell phones or personal electronic devices
by students during the school day; and
2. Use of cell phones or personal electronic devices by
students who use them to monitor health issues.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1276 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 28th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 15th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1276 Page 3